Idaho, session 2025, S1026.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Section 22-1002, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
22-1002. DEFINITIONS. (1) "Community gardening" means a single plot
of land that is gardened collectively by a group of people. Community gar-
dens can be further divided into single plots or maintained as one (1) large
plot. Entities, including but not limited to schools, food pantries, and
faith-based organizations, often host community gardens. City or county
land bank properties as well as privately owned plots are used for community
gardens.
(2) "Market gardening" means small-scale production of agricultural
products grown to sell through marketing channels such as farmers markets
and community supported agriculture shares.
(3) "Urban farming" means farming that produces food crops or raises
animals for personal use or for sale to others and can be larger in scale than
market gardening. Urban farms may be organized as for-profit businesses op-
erated by individuals or as nonprofit social enterprises designed to pro-
vide food to address food insecurity, provide vocational training, or ad-
dress another community issue, typically at the neighborhood level. Urban
farms operated as social enterprises are typically managed by nongovernmen-
tal organizations. Urban farming can include includes indoor controlled-
environment production, including hydroponic and aquaponic systems, and may
involve the responsible rearing of small-scale livestock or poultry to sup-
port food production goals.
(4) "Victory gardening" means producing food at one's residence pri-
marily for household consumption or donation.
SECTION 2. That Chapter 10, Title 22, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby amended by the addition thereto of a NEW SECTION, to be known and des-
ignated as Section 22-1003, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
22-1003. CHICKEN OWNERSHIP. (1) No deed restrictions, covenants, or
similar binding agreements running with the land shall prohibit or have the
effect of prohibiting ownership or pasturing of up to four (4) chickens per
two-tenths (.2) of an acre.


(2) A homeowner's association may adopt reasonable rules, subject to
applicable statutes and ordinances, regarding the housing and pasturing of
chickens, including a prohibition or restriction on ownership or pasturing
of roosters.
(3) This section applies to single-family dwellings only and does not
apply to multifamily units such as duplexes, apartments, or other attached
housing buildings.
(4) This section shall not apply to agricultural zones, rural proper-
ties, farms, or hobby farms where existing zoning regulations permit the
keeping of poultry.
SECTION 3. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2025.